Arkansas, session 2025, HB1518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-27-601, concerning definitions used
regarding computer crimes against minors, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(16) "Indistinguishable" means appearing to an ordinary person to be
an authentic depiction.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 6, Subchapter 6, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-27-611. Creating, distributing, possessing, or viewing artificial
intelligence-generated matter depicting sexually explicit conduct involving a
child.
*CEB151*
02/17/2025 6:42:46 PM CEB151

HB1518
(a) A person commits creating, distributing, possessing, or viewing
artificial intelligence-generated matter depicting sexually explicit conduct
involving a child if the person knowingly:
(1) Uses artificial intelligence or other computer technology
capable of processing and interpreting specific data inputs to generate
visual depictions to create a depiction of a child engaging in sexually
explicit conduct that is indistinguishable from a child actually engaging in
sexually explicit conduct;
(2) Receives for the purpose of selling or knowingly sells,
procures, manufactures, gives, provides, lends, trades, mails, delivers,
transfers, publishes, distributes, circulates, disseminates, presents,
exhibits, advertises, offers, or agrees to offer through any means an
artificial intelligence-generated or computer-generated depiction that is
indistinguishable from a child actually engaging in sexually explicit
conduct; or
(3) Possesses or views through any means an artificial
intelligence-generated or computer-generated depiction that is
indistinguishable from a child actually engaging in sexually explicit
conduct.
(b) Creating, distributing, possessing, or viewing artificial
intelligence-generated matter depicting sexually explicit conduct involving a
child is a:
(1) Class C felony for the first offense; and
(2) Class B felony for any subsequent offense.












02/17/2025 6:42:46 PM CEB151